Hawaii statutes.
[§667-98] Authorized bidder; successful
bidder. Any person, including the association, shall be authorized to bid
for the unit at the public sale and to purchase the unit. The highest bidder
who meets the requirements of the terms and conditions of the public sale shall
be the successful bidder. The public sale shall be considered as being held
when the unit is declared by the association as being sold to the successful
bidder. When the public sale is held, the successful bidder at the public
sale, as the purchaser, shall make a nonrefundable downpayment to the
association of not less than ten per cent of the highest successful bid price.
If the successful bidder is the association, the downpayment requirement may be
satisfied by offset and a credit bid up to the amount of the lien debt. [L
2012, c 182, pt of §3(2)]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next